Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1563.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) Any person who has been deprived of any rights, privileges or immunities
secured by Article I of the Oregon Constitution by a person acting under color of law may
bring a civil action for economic and noneconomic damages, as defined in ORS 31.705, and
for injunctive or other equitable relief.
(2) ORS 30.260 to 30.300 apply to an action under this section.
(3)(a) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs to a prevailing plaintiff
in an action under this section.
(b) The court may award reasonable attorney fees and costs to a prevailing defendant in
an action under this section only if the court determines that the plaintiff’s claim under this
section was frivolous, unreasonable or without foundation.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act applies to deprivations of rights, privileges or im-
munities secured by Article I of the Oregon Constitution that occur on or after the effective
date of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 214